Illinois, session 104th, SB3517.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 356z.3a as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.3a)7    Sec. 356z.3a. Billing; emergency services; 8nonparticipating providers.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Ancillary services" means:11        (1) items and services related to emergency medicine, 12    anesthesiology, pathology, radiology, and neonatology that 13    are provided by any health care provider;14        (2) items and services provided by assistant surgeons, 15    hospitalists, and intensivists;16        (3) diagnostic services, including radiology and 17    laboratory services, except for advanced diagnostic 18    laboratory tests identified on the most current list 19    published by the United States Secretary of Health and 20    Human Services under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-132(b)(3);21        (4) items and services provided by other specialty 22    practitioners as the United States Secretary of Health and 23    Human Services specifies through rulemaking under 42   SB3517 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1    U.S.C. 300gg-132(b)(3);2        (5) items and services provided by a nonparticipating 3    provider if there is no participating provider who can 4    furnish the item or service at the facility; and5        (6) items and services provided by a nonparticipating 6    provider if there is no participating provider who will 7    furnish the item or service because a participating 8    provider has asserted the participating provider's rights 9    under the Health Care Right of Conscience Act. 10    "Average gross charge rate" means, with respect to 11nonparticipating ground ambulance service providers, the 12average of the provider's gross charge rates in place for each 13individual charge described in subsection (b-15) of this 14Section for dates of service that fall within the 12-month 15period ending on June 30 immediately preceding the date on 16which the reporting of average gross charge rates is required. 17    "Cost sharing" means the amount an insured, beneficiary, 18or enrollee is responsible for paying for a covered item or 19service under the terms of the policy or certificate. "Cost 20sharing" includes copayments, coinsurance, and amounts paid 21toward deductibles, but does not include amounts paid towards 22premiums, balance billing by out-of-network providers, or the 23cost of items or services that are not covered under the policy 24or certificate.25    "Emergency department of a hospital" means any hospital 26department that provides emergency services, including a   SB3517 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1hospital outpatient department.2    "Emergency medical condition" has the meaning ascribed to 3that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform and Patient 4Rights Act.5    "Emergency medical screening examination" has the meaning 6ascribed to that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform 7and Patient Rights Act.8    "Emergency services" means, with respect to an emergency 9medical condition:10        (1) in general, an emergency medical screening 11    examination, including ancillary services routinely 12    available to the emergency department to evaluate such 13    emergency medical condition, and such further medical 14    examination and treatment as would be required to 15    stabilize the patient regardless of the department of the 16    hospital or other facility in which such further 17    examination or treatment is furnished; or18        (2) additional items and services for which benefits 19    are provided or covered under the coverage and that are 20    furnished by a nonparticipating provider or 21    nonparticipating emergency facility regardless of the 22    department of the hospital or other facility in which such 23    items are furnished after the insured, beneficiary, or 24    enrollee is stabilized and as part of outpatient 25    observation or an inpatient or outpatient stay with 26    respect to the visit in which the services described in   SB3517 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1    paragraph (1) are furnished. Services after stabilization 2    cease to be emergency services only when all the 3    conditions of 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111(a)(3)(C)(ii)(II) and 4    regulations thereunder are met.5    "Emergency ground ambulance service" means ground 6ambulance service provided by ground ambulance service 7providers, regardless of whether the patient was transported, 8if the service was provided pursuant to a request to 9-1-1 or 9an equivalent telephone number, texting system, or other 10method of summoning emergency service or if the service 11provided was provided when a patient's condition, at the time 12of service, was considered to be an emergency medical 13condition as determined by a physician licensed under the 14Medical Practice Act of 1987. 15    "Evaluation" means, with respect to emergency ground 16ambulance service, the provision of a medical screening 17examination to determine whether an emergency medical 18condition exists. 19    "Freestanding Emergency Center" means a facility licensed 20under Section 32.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 21Systems Act.22    "Ground ambulance service" means both medical 23transportation service that is described as ground ambulance 24service by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and 25medical nontransportation service, such as evaluation without 26transport, treatment without transport, or paramedic   SB3517 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1intercept, and that is, in either case, provided in a vehicle 2that is licensed as an ambulance under the Emergency Medical 3Services (EMS) Systems Act or by EMS Personnel assigned to a 4vehicle that is licensed as an ambulance under the Emergency 5Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. "Ground ambulance service" 6may include any combination of the following: emergency ground 7ambulance service in a ground ambulance, urgent ground 8ambulance service, evaluation without treatment, treatment 9without transport, and paramedic intercept.10    "Ground ambulance service provider" means a vehicle 11service provider under the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 12Systems Act that operates licensed ground ambulances for the 13purpose of providing emergency ground ambulance services, 14urgent ground ambulances services, or both. "Ground ambulance 15service provider" includes both ambulance providers and 16ambulance suppliers as described by the Centers for Medicare 17and Medicaid Services. 18    "Health care facility" means, in the context of 19non-emergency services, any of the following:20        (1) a hospital as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395x(e);21        (2) a hospital outpatient department;22        (3) a critical access hospital certified under 42 23    U.S.C. 1395i-4(e);24        (4) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 25    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or26        (5) any recipient of a license under the Hospital   SB3517 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1    Licensing Act that is not otherwise described in this 2    definition.3    "Health care provider" means a provider as defined in 4subsection (d) of Section 370g. "Health care provider" does 5not include a provider of air ambulance or ground ambulance 6services.7    "Health care services" has the meaning ascribed to that 8term in subsection (a) of Section 370g.9    "Health insurance issuer" has the meaning ascribed to that 10term in Section 5 of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability 11and Accountability Act.12    "Nonparticipating emergency facility" means, with respect 13to the furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group 14or individual health insurance coverage, any of the following 15facilities that does not have a contractual relationship 16directly or indirectly with a health insurance issuer in 17relation to the coverage:18        (1) an emergency department of a hospital;19        (2) a Freestanding Emergency Center;20        (3) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 21    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or22        (4) with respect to emergency services described in 23    paragraph (2) of the definition of "emergency services", a 24    hospital.25    "Nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider" 26means, with respect to the furnishing of an item or services   SB3517 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1under a policy of group or individual health insurance 2coverage, any ground ambulance service provider that does not 3have a contractual relationship directly or indirectly with a 4health insurance issuer in relation to the coverage. 5    "Nonparticipating provider" means, with respect to the 6furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group or 7individual health insurance coverage, any health care provider 8who does not have a contractual relationship directly or 9indirectly with a health insurance issuer in relation to the 10coverage.11    "Paramedic intercept" means a service in which a vehicle 12licensed under the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 13Act ground ambulance staffed by licensed advanced life support 14EMS Personnel paramedics rendezvouses with a ground ambulance 15staffed with basic life support or intermediate life support 16EMS Personnel nonparamedics to provide advanced life support 17care. As used in this definition, "advanced life support care" 18means life support care that is warranted when a patient's 19condition and need for treatment exceed the basic life support 20or intermediate life support level of care. 21    "Participating emergency facility" means any of the 22following facilities that has a contractual relationship 23directly or indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering 24group or individual health insurance coverage setting forth 25the terms and conditions on which a relevant health care 26service is provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee   SB3517 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1under the coverage:2        (1) an emergency department of a hospital;3        (2) a Freestanding Emergency Center;4        (3) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 5    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or6        (4) with respect to emergency services described in 7    paragraph (2) of the definition of "emergency services", a 8    hospital.9    For purposes of this definition, a single case agreement 10between an emergency facility and an issuer that is used to 11address unique situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or 12enrollee requires services that typically occur out-of-network 13constitutes a contractual relationship and is limited to the 14parties to the agreement.15    "Participating ground ambulance service provider" means 16any ground ambulance service provider that has a contractual 17relationship directly or indirectly with a health insurance 18issuer offering group or individual health insurance coverage 19setting forth the terms and conditions on which a relevant 20health care service is provided to an insured, beneficiary, or 21enrollee under the coverage. As used in this definition, a 22single case agreement between a ground ambulance service 23provider and a health insurance issuer that is used to address 24unique situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or 25enrollee requires services that typically occur out-of-network 26constitutes a contractual relationship and is limited to the   SB3517 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1parties of the agreement. 2    "Participating health care facility" means any health care 3facility that has a contractual relationship directly or 4indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering group or 5individual health insurance coverage setting forth the terms 6and conditions on which a relevant health care service is 7provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the 8coverage. A single case agreement between an emergency 9facility and an issuer that is used to address unique 10situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee 11requires services that typically occur out-of-network 12constitutes a contractual relationship for purposes of this 13definition and is limited to the parties to the agreement.14    "Participating provider" means any health care provider 15that has a contractual relationship directly or indirectly 16with a health insurance issuer offering group or individual 17health insurance coverage setting forth the terms and 18conditions on which a relevant health care service is provided 19to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the coverage.20    "Qualifying payment amount" has the meaning given to that 21term in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111(a)(3)(E) and the regulations 22promulgated thereunder.23    "Recognized amount" means, except as otherwise provided in 24this Section, the lesser of the amount initially billed by the 25provider or the qualifying payment amount.26    "Stabilize" means "stabilization" as defined in Section 10   SB3517 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1of the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act.2    "Treating provider" means a health care provider who has 3evaluated the individual.4    "Treatment" means, with respect to the provision of 5emergency ground ambulance service, the provision of an 6evaluation and either (i) a therapy or therapeutic agent used 7to treat an emergency medical condition or (ii) a procedure 8used to treat an emergency medical condition.9    "Urgent ground ambulance service" means ground ambulance 10service that is deemed medically necessary by a health care 11professional and is required within 12 hours after the 12certification of the need for the service. 13    "Visit" means, with respect to health care services 14furnished to an individual at a health care facility, health 15care services furnished by a provider at the facility, as well 16as equipment, devices, telehealth services, imaging services, 17laboratory services, and preoperative and postoperative 18services regardless of whether the provider furnishing such 19services is at the facility. 20    (b) Emergency services. When a beneficiary, insured, or 21enrollee receives emergency services from a nonparticipating 22provider or a nonparticipating emergency facility, the health 23insurance issuer shall ensure that the beneficiary, insured, 24or enrollee shall incur no greater out-of-pocket costs than 25the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee would have incurred with 26a participating provider or a participating emergency   SB3517 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1facility. Any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied as 2though the emergency services had been received from a 3participating provider or a participating facility. Cost 4sharing shall be calculated based on the recognized amount for 5the emergency services. If the cost sharing for the same item 6or service furnished by a participating provider would have 7been a flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be the 8cost-sharing amount unless the provider has billed a lesser 9total amount. In no event shall the beneficiary, insured, 10enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan sponsor be liable 11to or billed by the health insurance issuer, the 12nonparticipating provider, or the nonparticipating emergency 13facility for any amount beyond the cost sharing calculated in 14accordance with this subsection with respect to the emergency 15services delivered. Administrative requirements or limitations 16shall be no greater than those applicable to emergency 17services received from a participating provider or a 18participating emergency facility. 19    (b-5) Non-emergency services at participating health care 20facilities. 21        (1) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee utilizes 22    a participating health care facility and, due to any 23    reason, covered ancillary services are provided by a 24    nonparticipating provider during or resulting from the 25    visit, the health insurance issuer shall ensure that the 26    beneficiary, insured, or enrollee shall incur no greater   SB3517 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1    out-of-pocket costs than the beneficiary, insured, or 2    enrollee would have incurred with a participating provider 3    for the ancillary services. Any cost-sharing requirements 4    shall be applied as though the ancillary services had been 5    received from a participating provider. Cost sharing shall 6    be calculated based on the recognized amount for the 7    ancillary services. If the cost sharing for the same item 8    or service furnished by a participating provider would 9    have been a flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be 10    the cost-sharing amount unless the provider has billed a 11    lesser total amount. In no event shall the beneficiary, 12    insured, enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan 13    sponsor be liable to or billed by the health insurance 14    issuer, the nonparticipating provider, or the 15    participating health care facility for any amount beyond 16    the cost sharing calculated in accordance with this 17    subsection with respect to the ancillary services 18    delivered. In addition to ancillary services, the 19    requirements of this paragraph shall also apply with 20    respect to covered items or services furnished as a result 21    of unforeseen, urgent medical needs that arise at the time 22    an item or service is furnished, regardless of whether the 23    nonparticipating provider satisfied the notice and consent 24    criteria under paragraph (2) of this subsection. 25        (2) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee utilizes 26    a participating health care facility and receives   SB3517 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1    non-emergency covered health care services other than 2    those described in paragraph (1) of this subsection from a 3    nonparticipating provider during or resulting from the 4    visit, the health insurance issuer shall ensure that the 5    beneficiary, insured, or enrollee incurs no greater 6    out-of-pocket costs than the beneficiary, insured, or 7    enrollee would have incurred with a participating provider 8    unless the nonparticipating provider or the participating 9    health care facility on behalf of the nonparticipating 10    provider satisfies the notice and consent criteria 11    provided in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-132 and regulations 12    promulgated thereunder. If the notice and consent criteria 13    are not satisfied, then:14            (A) any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied 15        as though the health care services had been received 16        from a participating provider;17            (B) cost sharing shall be calculated based on the 18        recognized amount for the health care services; and19            (C) in no event shall the beneficiary, insured, 20        enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan sponsor be 21        liable to or billed by the health insurance issuer, 22        the nonparticipating provider, or the participating 23        health care facility for any amount beyond the cost 24        sharing calculated in accordance with this subsection 25        with respect to the health care services delivered. 26    (b-10) Coverage for ground ambulance services provided by   SB3517 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1nonparticipating ground ambulance service providers.2        (1) Any group or individual policy of accident and 3    health insurance amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on 4    or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for both 5    emergency ground ambulance service and urgent ground 6    ambulance service. 7        (2) Beginning on January 1, 2027, when a beneficiary, 8    insured, or enrollee receives emergency ground ambulance 9    services or urgent ambulance services from a 10    nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider, the 11    health insurance issuer shall ensure that the beneficiary, 12    insured, or enrollee shall incur no greater out-of-pocket 13    costs than the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee would 14    have incurred with a participating ground ambulance 15    provider. Any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied 16    as though the emergency ground ambulance services or 17    urgent ground ambulance services had been received from a 18    participating ground ambulance service provider. Except as 19    otherwise provided in State or federal law, cost sharing 20    shall be calculated based on the lesser of the policy's 21    copayment or coinsurance for an emergency room visit or 22    10% of the recognized amount. For purposes of this 23    subsection, the recognized amount shall be calculated as 24    provided for in paragraph (3) of this subsection. Except 25    as otherwise provided for in State or federal law, if the 26    cost sharing for the same item or service furnished by a   SB3517 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1    participating ground ambulance provider would have been a 2    flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be the 3    cost-sharing amount unless the nonparticipating ground 4    ambulance provider has billed a lesser total amount. 5        (3) Upon reasonable demand by a nonparticipating 6    ground ambulance service provider and after subtracting 7    the beneficiary's, insured's, or enrollee's cost sharing 8    amount, a health insurance issuer shall pay the 9    nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider as 10    follows: 11            (A) for nonparticipating ground ambulance service 12        providers subject to a unit of local government that 13        has jurisdiction over where the service was provided, 14        a rate that is equal to the rate established or 15        approved by the governing body of the local government 16        providing the ground ambulance service having 17        jurisdiction for that area or subarea; or18            (B) for nonparticipating ground ambulance service 19        providers that are not subject to the jurisdiction of 20        a unit of local government, a rate that is equal to the 21        lesser of (i) the negotiated rate between the 22        nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider and 23        the health insurance issuer; (ii) 85% of the 24        nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider's 25        billed charges; or (iii) the average gross charge rate 26        in effect for the date of service in question for a   SB3517 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1        base charge and, if applicable, a loaded mileage 2        charge, the nonparticipating ground ambulance service 3        provider has filed with the Department of Public 4        Health in accordance with subsection (b-15). 5            By accepting the payment from the health insurance 6        issuer, the nonparticipating ground ambulance service 7        provider shall not seek any payment from the 8        beneficiary, insured, or enrollee for any amount that 9        exceeds the deductible, coinsurance, or copay for 10        services provided to the beneficiary, insured, or 11        enrollee. 12    (b-15) Beginning on October 1, 2026, and each October 1 13thereafter, each nonparticipating ground ambulance service 14provider shall file annually with the Department of Public 15Health, in the form and manner prescribed by the Department of 16Public Health, its average gross charge rates and any other 17information required by the Department of Public Health, by 18rule, for each of the following ground ambulance charge 19descriptions, as applicable: (1) basic life support, urgent 20base; (2) basic life support, emergency base; (3) advanced 21life support, urgent, level 1 base; (4) advanced life support, 22emergency, level 1 base; (5) advanced life support, emergency, 23level 2 base; (6) specialty care transport base; (7) emergency 24response, evaluation without transport base; (8) emergency 25response, treatment without transport base; (9) emergency 26response, paramedic intercept base; and (10) loaded mileage,   SB3517 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1per loaded mile charge for each of the applicable base charge 2descriptions services. The Department of Public Health shall 3publish the submitted rate information by January 1, 2027 and 4every January 1 thereafter. The Department of Public Health 5may request information from ground ambulance service 6providers and health insurance issuers regarding factors 7contributing to the network status of the ground ambulance 8service providers. The Department of Public Health may, upon 9the submission of rate information, assess a fee to each 10ground ambulance service provider that shall not exceed the 11administrative costs to complete the Department of Public 12Health's obligations in this subsection. The Department of 13Public Health may also request information from nationally 14recognized organizations that provide data on health care 15costs. The Department of Insurance shall direct the health 16insurance issuer to the location in which the information 17reported to the Department of Public Health is stored. 18    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 19except when the notice and consent criteria are satisfied for 20the situation in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), any 21benefits a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee receives for 22services under the situations in subsection (b), (b-5), 23(b-10), or (b-15) are assigned to the nonparticipating 24providers, nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider, 25or the facility acting on their behalf. Upon receipt of the 26provider's bill or facility's bill, the health insurance   SB3517 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1issuer shall provide the nonparticipating provider, 2nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider, or the 3facility with a written explanation of benefits that specifies 4the proposed reimbursement and the applicable deductible, 5copayment, or coinsurance amounts owed by the insured, 6beneficiary, or enrollee. The health insurance issuer shall 7pay any reimbursement subject to this Section directly to the 8nonparticipating provider, nonparticipating ground ambulance 9service provider, or the facility.10    (d) For bills assigned under subsection (c), the 11nonparticipating provider or the facility may bill the health 12insurance issuer for the services rendered, and the health 13insurance issuer may pay the billed amount or attempt to 14negotiate reimbursement with the nonparticipating provider or 15the facility. Within 30 calendar days after the provider or 16facility transmits the bill to the health insurance issuer, 17the issuer shall send an initial payment or notice of denial of 18payment with the written explanation of benefits to the 19provider or facility. If attempts to negotiate reimbursement 20for services provided by a nonparticipating provider do not 21result in a resolution of the payment dispute within 30 days 22after receipt of written explanation of benefits by the health 23insurance issuer, then the health insurance issuer or 24nonparticipating provider or the facility may initiate binding 25arbitration to determine payment for services provided on a 26per-bill or batched-bill basis, in accordance with Section   SB3517 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1300gg-111 of the Public Health Service Act and the regulations 2promulgated thereunder. The party requesting arbitration shall 3notify the other party arbitration has been initiated and 4state its final offer before arbitration. In response to this 5notice, the nonrequesting party shall inform the requesting 6party of its final offer before the arbitration occurs. 7Arbitration shall be initiated by filing a request with the 8Department of Insurance.9    (e) The Department of Insurance shall publish a list of 10approved arbitrators or entities that shall provide binding 11arbitration. These arbitrators shall be American Arbitration 12Association or American Health Lawyers Association trained 13arbitrators. Both parties must agree on an arbitrator from the 14Department of Insurance's or its approved entity's list of 15arbitrators. If no agreement can be reached, then a list of 5 16arbitrators shall be provided by the Department of Insurance 17or the approved entity. From the list of 5 arbitrators, the 18health insurance issuer can veto 2 arbitrators and the 19provider or facility can veto 2 arbitrators. The remaining 20arbitrator shall be the chosen arbitrator. This arbitration 21shall consist of a review of the written submissions by both 22parties. The arbitrator shall not establish a rebuttable 23presumption that the qualifying payment amount should be the 24total amount owed to the provider or facility by the 25combination of the issuer and the insured, beneficiary, or 26enrollee. Binding arbitration shall provide for a written   SB3517 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1decision within 45 days after the request is filed with the 2Department of Insurance. Both parties shall be bound by the 3arbitrator's decision. The arbitrator's expenses and fees, 4together with other expenses, not including attorney's fees, 5incurred in the conduct of the arbitration, shall be paid as 6provided in the decision.7    (f) (Blank).8    (g) Section 368a of this Code Act shall not apply during 9the pendency of a decision under subsection (d). Upon the 10issuance of the arbitrator's decision, Section 368a applies 11with respect to the amount, if any, by which the arbitrator's 12determination exceeds the issuer's initial payment under 13subsection (c), or the entire amount of the arbitrator's 14determination if initial payment was denied. Any interest 15required to be paid to a provider under Section 368a shall not 16accrue until after 30 days of an arbitrator's decision as 17provided in subsection (d), but in no circumstances longer 18than 150 days from the date the nonparticipating 19facility-based provider billed for services rendered.20    (h) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to change 21the prudent layperson provisions with respect to emergency 22services under the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act. 23    (i) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a health care 24provider from billing a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee for 25reasonable administrative fees, such as service fees for 26checks returned for nonsufficient funds and missed   SB3517 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1appointments.2    (j) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a beneficiary, 3insured, or enrollee from assigning benefits to a 4nonparticipating provider when the notice and consent criteria 5are satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5) or in 6any other situation not described in subsection (b) or (b-5).7    (k) Except when the notice and consent criteria are 8satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), if an 9individual receives health care services under the situations 10described in subsection (b) or (b-5), no referral requirement 11or any other provision contained in the policy or certificate 12of coverage shall deny coverage, reduce benefits, or otherwise 13defeat the requirements of this Section for services that 14would have been covered with a participating provider. 15However, this subsection shall not be construed to preclude a 16provider contract with a health insurance issuer, or with an 17administrator or similar entity acting on the issuer's behalf, 18from imposing requirements on the participating provider, 19participating emergency facility, or participating health care 20facility relating to the referral of covered individuals to 21nonparticipating providers.22    (l) Except if the notice and consent criteria are 23satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), 24cost-sharing amounts calculated in conformity with this 25Section shall count toward any deductible or out-of-pocket 26maximum applicable to in-network coverage.  SB3517 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1    (m) The Department has the authority to enforce the 2requirements of this Section in the situations described in 3subsections (b) and (b-5), and in any other situation for 4which 42 U.S.C. Chapter 6A, Subchapter XXV, Parts D or E and 5regulations promulgated thereunder would prohibit an 6individual from being billed or liable for emergency services 7furnished by a nonparticipating provider or nonparticipating 8emergency facility or for non-emergency health care services 9furnished by a nonparticipating provider at a participating 10health care facility.11    (n) This Section does not apply with respect to air 12ambulance services. This Section does not apply to any policy 13of excepted benefits or to short-term, limited-duration health 14insurance coverage. 15    (o) A home rule unit may not regulate payments for ground 16ambulance service in a manner inconsistent with this Section. 17This subsection is a limitation under subsection (i) of 18Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 19concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 20exercised by the State. 21    (p) (o) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 22contrary, if a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee receives 23neonatal intensive care from a nonparticipating provider or 24nonparticipating facility, a health insurance issuer shall 25ensure that the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee shall incur 26no greater out-of-pocket costs than he or she would have   SB3517 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1incurred with a participating provider or a participating 2facility, as long as the nonparticipating provider or 3nonparticipating facility bills the neonatal intensive care as 4emergency services. 5(Source: P.A. 103-440, eff. 1-1-24; 104-60, eff. 1-1-26; 6104-248, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 7    Section 10. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 8amended by changing Section 4-15 as follows: 9    (215 ILCS 125/4-15)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1409.8)10    Sec. 4-15. (a) No contract or evidence of coverage for 11basic health care services delivered, issued for delivery, 12renewed, or amended by a Health Maintenance Organization shall 13exclude coverage for ground ambulance service as defined in 14Section 356z.3a of the Illinois Insurance Code emergency 15transportation by ambulance. For the purposes of this Section, 16the term "emergency" means a need for immediate medical 17attention resulting from a life threatening condition or 18situation or a need for immediate medical attention as 19otherwise reasonably determined by a physician, public safety 20official or other emergency medical personnel.21    (b) Payments to nonparticipating ground ambulance service 22providers shall be as described in subsection (b-10) of 23Section 356z.3a of the Illinois Insurance Code Upon reasonable 24demand by a provider of emergency transportation by ambulance,   SB3517 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 18998 BAB 32443 b1a Health Maintenance Organization shall promptly pay to the 2provider, subject to coverage limitations stated in the 3contract or evidence of coverage, the charges for emergency 4transportation by ambulance provided to an enrollee in a 5health care plan arranged for by the Health Maintenance 6Organization. By accepting any such payment from the Health 7Maintenance Organization, the provider of emergency 8transportation by ambulance agrees not to seek any payment 9from the enrollee for services provided to the enrollee.10(Source: P.A. 86-833; 86-1028.)